04_Morphology/3kor.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>	! Noun
%<voc%> ! Vocative
%<loc%> ! Locative
%<nom%> ! Nominative
%<acc%> ! Accusative
%<gen%> ! Genitive
%<dative%> ! Dative
%<locins%> ! Locative Instrumental
%<inst%> ! Instrumental
%{이%} ! Used with preceeding final consonant ex. "집이"
%{가%} ! Used with preeceding final vowel ex. "학교가"
%{을%} ! Used with preceeding final consonant ex. "집을"
%{를%} ! Used with preceeding final vowel ex. "학교를"
%{으로%} ! Used with final consonant ex. "집으로"
%{로%} ! Used with preceeding final vowel ex. "학교로"

LEXICON Root

Noun_Stems ; ! To help edit all the options


LEXICON LOC

%<n%>: CASE_Loc ;

LEXICON CASE_Loc

%<voc%>: # ; ! Used to say the name of the noun
%<nom%>:%>%{이%} # ; ! Need to make twol rule for 이/가 add 2nd to multi
%<acc%>:%>%{을%} # ; ! Need to make twol rule for 을/를 add 2nd to multi
%<gen%>:%>%의 # ; ! Indicates posession
%<dative%>:%>%에 # ; ! Indicates location of an action or existence
%<loc%>:%>%에서 # ; ! Indicates the location that an action took place
%<locins%>:%>%{으로%} # ; ! Need to make twol rule for 으로/로 add 2nd to multichars

LEXICON NON_LOC

%<n%>: CASE_Non_Loc ;

LEXICON CASE_Non_Loc

%<voc%>: # ; ! Used to say the name of the noun
%<nom%>:%>%{이%} # ; ! Need to make twol rule for 이/가
%<acc%>:%>%{을%} # ; ! Need to make twol rule for 을/를
%<gen%>:%>%의 # ; ! Indicates posession
%<ins%>:%>%{으로%} # ; ! Need to make twol rule for 으로/로


LEXICON Noun_Stems

학교:학교 LOC ; ! "school"
집:집 LOC ; ! "home"
병원:병원 LOC ; ! "hospital"
산:산 LOC ; ! "mountain"
바다:바다 LOC ; ! "ocean"
사람:사람 NON_LOC ; ! "person"
고양이:고양이 NON_LOC ; ! "cat"
개:개 NON_LOC ; ! "dog"
꽃:꽃 NON_LOC ; ! "flower"
나무:나무 NON_LOC ; ! "tree"
컴퓨터:컴퓨터 NON_LOC ; ! "computer"
책:책 NON_LOC ; ! "book"
음식:음식 NON_LOC ; ! "food"
차:차 NON_LOC ; ! "car"
옷:옷 NON_LOC ; ! "clothes"
친구:친구 NON_LOC ; ! "friend"
시간:시간 NON_LOC ; ! "time"
사진:사진 NON_LOC ; ! "time"
돈:돈 NON_LOC ; ! "money"
음악:음악 NON_LOC ; ! "music"
